New York, session 2025-2026, A4527.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "Noah's Law". 2 § 2. The penal law is amended by adding two new sections 260.16 and 3 260.17 to read as follows: 4 § 260.16 Child abuse in the second degree. 5 A person is guilty of child abuse in the second degree when: 6 1. Through omission, neglect, or a reckless act, they cause serious 7 physical and/or mental harm to a child; 8 2. They knowingly or intentionally commit an act which is likely to 9 cause physical and/or mental harm to a child, regardless of if such harm 10 occurs; or 11 3. They knowingly or intentionally commit an act which is cruel to a 12 child, regardless of if any harm occurs. 13 Child abuse in the second degree is a class B felony. 14 § 260.17 Child abuse in the first degree. 15 A person is guilty of child abuse in the first degree when they know- 16 ingly or intentionally cause serious physical and/or mental harm to a 17 child. 18 Child abuse in the first degree is a class A felony. 19 § 3. The penal law is amended by adding two new sections 260.36 and 20 260.37 to read as follows: 21 § 260.36 Vulnerable elderly person or incompetent or physically disabled 22 person abuse in the second degree. 23 A person is guilty of vulnerable elderly person or incompetent or 24 physically disabled person abuse in the second degree when: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02798-01-5 A. 4527 2 1 1. Through omission, neglect, or a reckless act, they cause serious 2 physical and/or mental harm to a vulnerable elderly person or incompe- 3 tent or physically disabled person; 4 2. They knowingly or intentionally commit an act which is likely to 5 cause physical and/or mental harm to a vulnerable elderly person or 6 incompetent or physically disabled person, regardless of if such harm 7 occurs; or 8 3. They knowingly or intentionally commit an act which is cruel to a 9 vulnerable elderly person or incompetent or physically disabled person, 10 regardless of if any harm occurs. 11 Vulnerable elderly person or incompetent or physically disabled person 12 abuse in the second degree is a class B felony. 13 § 260.37 Vulnerable elderly person or incompetent or physically disabled 14 person abuse in the first degree. 15 A person is guilty of vulnerable elderly person or incompetent or 16 physically disabled person abuse in the first degree when they knowingly 17 or intentionally cause serious physical and/or mental harm to a vulner- 18 able elderly person or incompetent or physically disabled person. 19 Vulnerable elderly person or incompetent or physically disabled person 20 abuse in the first degree is a class A felony. 21 § 4. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 260.40 to read 22 as follows: 23 § 260.40 Torture. 24 A person is guilty of torture when they knowingly and cruelly inflict 25 serious physical injury and/or severe mental pain or suffering upon 26 another person within their custody or physical control. Torture does 27 not require any proof that the victim suffered pain. 28 Torture is a class A felony. 29 § 5. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 30 have become a law.